Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions
§ 65-7-77.
Counties may work roads in adjoining counties.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county finds that any public road, bridge, or causeway located in a contiguous county and leading therefrom and into that county is not properly worked or is not kept in good repair by the county in which same is located, and finds that its own county would be benefited by the proper working and repairing of such public road, bridge, or causeway, then in such event the board of supervisors of the county which would be benefited is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to cause to be constructed, improved, worked, repaired, and maintained, at the expense of the county which would be benefited, any such public road, bridge, or causeway for a distance not exceeding three and one-half miles beyond the line of the county which would be benefited, provided that the board of supervisors of the county in which such public road, bridge, or causeway is located shall consent thereto. The board of supervisors of any county which would be benefited is authorized and empowered, for and in the name of such county, to make all necessary contracts for the construction, improving, working, repairing, or maintaining of such public road, bridge, or causeway as herein provided, and to pay for the same either out of the general funds of the benefited county or out of the proceeds of the bonds of such benefited county, issued as otherwise provided by law, either for such purpose or for such purpose and any other lawful purpose. In instances where one or more, or parts of one or more, townships of any county are cut off from convenient communication with the county seat of last said county, either by the interposition of the territory of a contiguous county or by a watercourse or other body of water or by both, then the board of supervisors of the county which would be benefited or whose communication with its county seat is so obstructed or interfered with as aforesaid may, at its discretion and with the consent of the board of supervisors of such contiguous county, lay out, open, construct, improve, work, repair, and maintain, or construct, improve, work, repair, or maintain if already laid out, opened, or established, as much as three and one-half miles in length of road in or through a contiguous county, and pay for the same as hereinabove provided.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county finds by order or resolution entered upon its minutes that it is to the best interest of the citizens of said county for it so to do, that a public necessity therefor exists, and that said county would be benefited thereby, it is authorized and empowered in its discretion to cause to be constructed or reconstructed, at the expense of such county, such portion as it may elect of any public road lying in a contiguous county which extends from the county line of such county into such contiguous county, together with one or more connecting roads leading therefrom located in the contiguous county. The construction or reconstruction of the public road lying in a contiguous county which extends from the county line of such county into such contiguous county may be paid for out of county road funds, state aid road funds, or such other funds as may be available therefor. However, state aid road funds shall not be used to construct or reconstruct any connecting road located in the contiguous county, and the county constructing or reconstructing said connecting roads may pay therefor only from county road funds or such funds as may be available therefor other than state aid road funds. In the event state aid funds are used in connection with the exercise of the power and authority granted in this subsection, the state aid engineer’s duties, responsibilities, and authority with respect thereto shall be the same as that provided by the law governing state aid projects.

Before exercising any rights or authority granted in this subsection, the board of supervisors of the county proposing to take advantage of the authority herein contained shall secure the consent of the board of supervisors of the contiguous county, which consent shall be evidenced by an order or resolution of the board of supervisors of the contiguous county and spread upon its minutes.

The boards of supervisors of any two adjoining counties may, by an agreement spread upon the minutes of the board of each of such counties, join together in the construction, reconstruction, improvement, working, repair, or maintenance of any public road, bridge, or causeway, including the approaches to such bridge or causeway, located partly in each of such counties, or benefiting each of such counties, for a distance of not exceeding three and one-half miles beyond the county line in either of such counties, and may jointly perform such work or jointly award contracts therefor and jointly pay the cost thereof, as provided in said agreement between said boards, from funds authorized by law for roads, bridges, or causeways located entirely within either of such counties. Such an agreement may be terminated in whole or in part by a succeeding board of supervisors of either of such counties, provided, however, that each of such counties shall remain obligated to pay its respective part of any outstanding obligations connected with or arising from said joint project. Unless the board of each county agrees otherwise, upon termination of such an agreement the responsibilities of future construction, reconstruction, improvement, working, repair, or maintenance on such road, bridge, or causeway shall be that of the county in which the respective parts thereof are located.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6356; 1942, § 8322; Laws, 1928, ch. 80; Laws, 1968, ch. 293, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 65-7-79.
Counties may join with municipalities in keeping up roads.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a main highway in said county runs through several municipalities in said county, and lies partly within said municipalities and partly without, may join in and co-operate with the said municipalities in the joint construction, improvement, and maintenance of said highway, and out of the county road and bridge fund may pay a proportionate part of the cost of such construction, improvement, and maintenance, the municipalities also paying their proportionate parts. The board of supervisors may distribute its pro rata part of such cost over a period of not exceeding five annual payments and may direct its president to execute the notes of the county for said annual payments, to draw interest at a rate not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 3808; 1930, § 6359; 1942, § 8323; Laws, 1914, ch. 180; Laws, 1926, ch. 231.

§ 65-7-81.
State highways within or without municipalities.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of any county in the state may construct, reconstruct, maintain, or contribute to the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of any state highway declared by legislative act expressly to be such highway or which, in accordance with law, has been taken over by the State Highway Department for construction, reconstruction, or maintenance; and this section shall apply to such state highway within as well as without the limits of any municipality and, when within such limits, with or without the consent of the municipal authorities. In such cases and for said purposes the board of supervisors, for and in the name of the county, may fully exercise the right of eminent domain within any municipality, and it shall be the duty of the board so to do on the lawful demand of the State Highway Department. This section shall apply also to said state highways within a separate road district, or districts, adjacent to a municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6360; 1942, § 8324; Laws, 1928, ch. 82; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 37, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-81.
State highways within or without municipalities.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of any county in the state may construct, reconstruct, maintain or contribute to the construction, reconstruction and maintenance of any state highway declared by legislative act expressly to be such highway or which, in accordance with law, has been taken over by the State Highway Department for construction, reconstruction or maintenance; and this section shall apply to such state highway within as well as without the limits of any municipality and, when within such limits, with or without the consent of the municipal authorities. In such cases and for said purposes the board of supervisors, for and in the name of the county, may fully exercise the right of eminent domain within any municipality, and it shall be the duty of the board so to do on the lawful demand of the State Highway Department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6360; 1942, § 8324; Laws, 1928, ch. 82; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 37, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-83.
Assumption by counties of concurrent jurisdiction over municipal streets for maintenance purposes.

The board of supervisors of any county may, by consent of or agreement with the proper governing authorities of any municipality within such county, assume concurrent jurisdiction over any street in such municipality for maintenance purposes where such street is a continuation of or intersects a local or county road already under the jurisdiction of such board of supervisors.

Such consent or agreement to the assumption of said concurrent jurisdiction shall be entered into only by the entering of an order on the minutes of both of said boards.

The liability heretofore imposed by law upon any municipality for or on account of the negligent construction or maintenance of any municipal street shall not be changed, diminished, or increased in any way by the provisions of this section.

Said boards of supervisors may, in their discretion, authorize the use of county-owned machinery and equipment in the construction and maintenance of municipal streets, whether or not said streets intersect a local or county road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8325; Laws, 1938, ch. 316; Laws, 1962, ch. 259, eff from and after July 1, 1962.

§ 65-7-85.
Construction and maintenance by county of streets within municipalities.

The several counties of the state, acting by and through the boards of supervisors thereof, are hereby invested, within their discretion, with full authority to expend monies and to do, within any municipalities of the county all acts regarding construction and maintenance of roads and streets that they may do within the county outside the limits of said municipalities.

The authority granted under this section shall be construed as additional and cumulative to all existing authority for the expenditure of county funds within municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8325.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 324, §§ 1 and 2, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1971).

§ 65-7-87.
Certain counties may construct village streets.

The board of supervisors of any county of the state of the second class, having a population of more than fifty thousand according to the 1930 federal census, situated wholly within a levee district, and in which there is situated a city of more than fourteen thousand population, is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to construct or assist in the construction of any streets of any village or town of less than five hundred population in said county, and to pay for same out of the highway maintenance fund or any other county fund available to said county for highway construction purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8326; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess. ch. 58.

§ 65-7-89.
Eminent domain, generally.

When the board of supervisors shall be unable to agree with the owners for any land necessary for widening any existing public road or for making changes therein or for laying out new public roads, it is authorized and empowered, in addition to the methods of procedure provided in previous sections of this chapter, to condemn any such land in the name of the county in the manner as is provided by law for the exercise of the right of eminent domain.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 395; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3769; 1930, § 6361; 1942, § 8327.

§ 65-7-91.
Supervisors may establish stations for work.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors may purchase or lease land upon which to establish stations for the working of the public roads, and may erect on the land barns, sheds, and other necessary buildings for the working of the public roads; but the board shall not purchase over ten (10) acres of land for any one (1) station. If the board is unable to purchase or lease, upon terms satisfactory to it, a site selected by it for a station, or in case it is unable to agree with any landowner as to the amount of compensation he shall receive for any land so selected, then the board may proceed to obtain not more than two (2) acres of said site by eminent domain, and the right of eminent domain for no more than two (2) acres is hereby conferred upon the boards of supervisors for said purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259a; 1930, § 6383; 1942, § 8332; Laws, 1920, ch. 266; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 38; Laws, 2012, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-7-91.
Supervisors may establish stations for work.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors may, for the benefit of the county, purchase or lease real property upon which to establish facilities for the working of the public roads, and may erect on the real property barns, sheds, and other necessary buildings for the working of the public roads. However, only real property belonging to or under the control of the state or some other governmental entity may be leased at no more than fair market value by the county for such purposes and any such lease shall be for a term of not less than twenty-five (25) years.

On or before October 1, 1990, the board shall establish and maintain one (1) central road repair and maintenance facility for the county or may designate an existing facility as the central road repair and maintenance facility for the county. Additional road repair and maintenance facilities may be established if the board, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, determines the establishment of these facilities is essential for the effective and efficient management of the county road and bridge programs.

From and after October 1, 1990, no road repair and maintenance facilities shall be located on any land not owned by the county or leased by the county in accordance with this section unless these facilities are located on sixteenth section school lands or lands granted in lieu thereof.

If the board is not able to purchase, upon terms satisfactory to it, a site selected by it for a facility, or in case the board is unable to agree with any landowner as to the amount of compensation he is to receive for any real property so selected, then the board may proceed to obtain not more than two (2) acres of the property by eminent domain, and the right of eminent domain for no more than two (2) acres is hereby conferred upon the boards of supervisors for such purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 7259a; 1930, § 6383; 1942, § 8332; Laws, 1920, ch. 266; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 38; Laws, 2012, ch. 435, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-7-92.
Authorization to borrow money and issue notes to finance establishment of work stations.

In order to acquire or improve real property for the establishment of road repair and maintenance facilities as authorized to be established and maintained on or before October 1, 1990, in Section 65-7-91, the board of supervisors of any county may borrow money from any source and issue negotiable notes of the county in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in the aggregate. The notes shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed the rate of interest authorized to be paid by counties on general obligation bonds and shall be sold in accordance with the provisions of Section 31-19-25. The notes shall mature in approximately equal annual installments over a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the date of issuance thereof. The notes shall be repaid out of any available funds of the county. The notes shall not be considered when computing the limitation of indebtedness under Section 19-9-5.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 39, eff from and after passage (approved August 16, 1988).

§ 65-7-93.
Counties authorized to match federal funds.

The board of supervisors of any county in this state is hereby authorized and empowered to use any available road funds of the county or beat to match any available federal funds for the purpose of building, hard surfacing, or graveling the roads of the respective county or beats of the county. Roads designated as school transportation routes shall be given preference.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized and empowered to permit the use of county labor, machinery, and equipment, and to appropriate funds from the county’s part of the gasoline money for purposes provided in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8328; Laws, 1940, ch. 188.

§ 65-7-95.
Methods of construction and maintenance.

The methods of constructing, reconstructing and maintaining the public roads and bridges in this state, other than those under the actual charge of the State Highway Department, shall be as follows:

Any county may purchase implements and material through its central purchase system; may employ labor; may work, construct, reconstruct and maintain the public roads; may build bridges; and may do any and all things necessary to be done to work, construct, reconstruct and maintain the public roads and to build bridges as herein provided. If, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, any part of the work necessary to be done in working, constructing, reconstructing and maintaining the public roads and in building bridges in such county, or any part or parts thereof, can best be done by awarding contracts therefor, the board of supervisors may advertise for bids and make contracts therefor in accordance with the provisions of Section 31-7-13; and the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, use any funds heretofore or hereafter raised by bond issue or otherwise for working, constructing, reconstructing, maintaining and improving the public roads and for building bridges as herein provided. Except for contracts exempt from the provisions of Section 19-11-27, no contract provided above shall be awarded that shall extend beyond thirty (30) days from the termination and end of the term of office of the members of the boards of supervisors awarding same.

Before any board of supervisors may hire, lease or rent any heavy road machinery or equipment for use in the construction, reconstruction or maintenance of any county road or bridge, such board of supervisors shall first adopt an order adjudicating the necessity for leasing or renting such machinery or equipment, the purposes for which it is to be used, the type of such machinery or equipment and the reasons why the leasing or renting thereof will promote the public interest of the county. Such order shall also direct the clerk of the board of supervisors to advertise for bids for such machinery or equipment, which bids shall be returnable on a day to be fixed by the board of supervisors, in accordance with Section 31-7-13.

All contracts for the leasing or renting of such machinery or equipment shall be awarded to the lowest and best responsible bidder whose bid price or rental consideration is not in excess of the current rates and charges fixed and prescribed by the Nielsen/Data Quest publication, which rates and charges fixed and prescribed by the Nielsen/Data Quest publication shall be on file with the Governor’s Office of General Services at that time.

All invoices submitted for the leasing or renting of such machinery or equipment shall identify the equipment by number and name and shall include the number of hours of labor performed and the dates thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6381; 1942, § 8330; Laws, 1928, ch. 156; Laws, 1932, ch. 196; Laws, 1962, ch. 260, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 25; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 40, eff from and after October 1, 1989; Laws, 2019, ch. 475, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).

§ 65-7-97.
Installment buying prohibited.

The boards of supervisors are hereby prohibited from purchasing any machinery or equipment under a contract requiring installment or deferred payments. However, this section shall not be construed to prohibit boards of supervisors from making purchases which shall be paid for not later than the next regular meeting of said board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8331; Laws, 1932, ch. 205.

§ 65-7-99.
Acquisition of gravel beds and sale of excess supply.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Any county, or road district organized and operating under any road law of the state, is authorized and empowered to purchase and hold, or to lease, any land containing gravel, sand, clay, chert, or other road building material to be used in the construction and maintenance of roads, and to sell off any of such road building material in excess of its own needs. Such land or lease is to be held in the name of the county when purchased or leased by the county, and to be held in the name of the county for the use of the road district when the purchase or lease is made for the district, but no purchase shall be made by a district except with the consent of the board of supervisors. Such land or lease is to be paid for out of the proper county fund when purchased or leased by the county, and to be paid for out of any funds belonging to the road district when the purchase or lease is for the district, and any funds arising from the sale of material is to be turned back into the fund from which the purchase price was made. And the necessary roads or other means to reach and use the property aforesaid may be constructed and maintained by the county or road district.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7132; 1930, § 6384; 1942, § 8333; Laws, 1914, ch. 181; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 41, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-99.
Acquisition of gravel beds and sale of excess supply.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Any county is authorized and empowered to purchase and hold, or to lease, any land containing gravel, sand, clay, chert or other road building material to be used in the construction and maintenance of roads, and to sell off any of such road building material in excess of its own needs. Such land or lease is to be held in the name of the county. Such land or lease is to be paid for out of the proper county fund, and any funds arising from the sale of material are to be turned back into the fund from which the purchase price was made. The necessary roads or other means to reach and use the property aforesaid may be constructed and maintained by the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7132; 1930, § 6384; 1942, § 8333; Laws, 1914, ch. 181; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 41, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-101.
Timber and gravel for bridges and causeways.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The overseer, road commissioner, or contractor of the road on which any bridge or roadway is to be erected or repaired shall have authority to take from the land, stream, bayous, or banks lying within a reasonable distance of the bridge or causeway or roadway the timber, gravel, dirt, and other road material necessary for such bridge, causeway, or roadway after the board of supervisors has assessed the value thereof and paid or tendered to the owner of the timber, gravel, dirt, or other road material the value thereof, by a warrant on the county treasurer. If the proprietor be dissatisfied with such valuation, he may appeal to the circuit court; but the valuation of the board shall be prima facie evidence of the value of the timber, gravel, or dirt. But no shade trees or ornamental trees shall be taken to be used on roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 7 (37); 1857, ch. 15, art. 39; 1871, § 2377; 1880, § 871; 1892, § 3938; 1906, § 4451; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7131; 1930, § 6385; 1942, § 8334; Laws, 1916, ch. 178; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 42, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-101.
Timber and gravel for bridges and causeways.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Whenever any bridge or roadway is to be erected or repaired, the county road manager shall have authority to take from the land, stream, bayous or banks lying within a reasonable distance of the bridge or causeway or roadway the timber, gravel, dirt, and other road material necessary for such bridge, causeway or roadway after the board of supervisors has assessed the value thereof and paid or tendered to the owner of the timber, gravel, dirt or other road material the value thereof, by a warrant on the county treasurer. If the proprietor be dissatisfied with such valuation, he may appeal to the circuit court; but the valuation of the board shall be prima facie evidence of the value of the timber, gravel or dirt. But no shade trees or ornamental trees shall be taken to be used on roads.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 10, art. 7 (37); 1857, ch. 15, art. 39; 1871, § 2377; 1880, § 871; 1892, § 3938; 1906, § 4451; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7131; 1930, § 6385; 1942, § 8334; Laws, 1916, ch. 178; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 42, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-103.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 28, eff from and after January 1, 1981.

[Codes, 1930, § 6386; 1942, § 8335; Laws, 1928, ch. 157; 1950, ch. 249]

§ 65-7-105.
Plans and specifications.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Before any road, or any part thereof, or any bridge shall be let out to contract where the amount of the contract will exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), the road commissioner, or engineer if there be one, shall inspect the road or part thereof or the bridge so proposed to be contracted, and shall carefully note the character and amount of work needed on same and all else necessary to make same a good and acceptable highway. The road commissioner, or engineer if there be one, shall then prepare detailed plans and specifications for the construction or reconstruction or working of same by contract, which shall be presented to the board of supervisors for approval. The plans and specifications shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors for the inspection of prospective bidders, prior to the first public letting under the terms hereof at a regular meeting to be named; and at any time prior to the acceptance of bids, the board may alter the plans and specifications submitted, and thereupon readvertise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4468; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7142; 1930, § 6387; 1942, § 8336; Laws, 1986, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 43, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-105.
Plans and specifications.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Before any road, or any part thereof, or any bridge shall be let out to contract where the amount of the contract will exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), the county road manager, or engineer if there be one, shall inspect the road or part thereof or the bridge so proposed to be contracted, and shall carefully note the character and amount of work needed on same and all else necessary to make same a good and acceptable highway. The county road manager, or engineer if there be one, shall then prepare detailed plans and specifications for the construction or reconstruction or working of same by contract, which shall be presented to the board of supervisors for approval. The plans and specifications shall be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors for the inspection of prospective bidders, prior to the first public letting under the terms hereof at a regular meeting to be named; and at any time prior to the acceptance of bids, the board may alter the plans and specifications submitted, and thereupon readvertise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4468; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7142; 1930, § 6387; 1942, § 8336; Laws, 1986, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 43, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-107.
Contracts in vacation.

Where any contract is made, as provided herein, by any member of the board of supervisors in vacation without competitive bids, and the amount of such contract exceeds the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), it shall be the duty of the member of the board of supervisors making such contract to obtain bids from at least two (2) bidders before making such contract, and to file a statement of the amount of each such bid with the board at its next meeting.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6388; 1942, § 8337; Laws, 1928, ch. 157.

§ 65-7-109.
Roads built with oyster shells.

All road authorities and contractors in counties, parts of counties, and municipalities in this state who construct, build, or repair public roads and streets with oyster shells shall, within ten days after the foundation is laid for such road, put a surface of crushed shells or other surfacing equal thereto for the purpose of making such roads smooth; and each half mile in rural districts and each block in cities shall be surfaced within said time after the foundation of such road shall be laid. All surface repair work shall be done with crushed shell, or material equal thereto, where the foundation is laid with such uncrushed oyster shells, so that said road shall be made smooth and traversable without injury to animal or vehicle. Where foundation is repaired with uncrushed shells, the surfacing shall be done as soon as reasonably possible, not to exceed ten days after such foundation is laid.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7257; 1930, § 6409; 1942, § 8338; Laws, 1916, ch. 176.

§ 65-7-111.
Penalty for violating provision for shell surfacing.

A failure to comply with the terms of Section 65-7-109 shall constitute a misdemeanor, and any person convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction shall be fined not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) or be imprisoned in jail not to exceed ten days, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7258; 1930, § 6410; 1942, § 8339; Laws, 1916, ch. 176.

§ 65-7-113.
Working roads with convicts.

The boards of supervisors may provide for the working of public roads with the convicts sentenced to the county jails, or committed for failure to pay the fine and costs imposed upon them; and if they do so, they may make the necessary contracts for that purpose, or employ suitable persons to have charge of and superintend the labor of the convicts. The board of supervisors may require the contractor of any road to take and work the convicts sentenced to the county jail, or committed to same to pay fine and cost imposed upon them, upon such terms and conditions as the said board and contractor may agree upon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3932; 1906, §§ 4444, 4471; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 7124, 7146; 1930, § 6412; 1942, § 8342.

§ 65-7-115.
Supervisors to have general supervision; board may provide for transportation needs of its members.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The supervisor of each district in each county is to have and is required to exercise general supervision over the public highways of his district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4467; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7141; 1930, § 6413; 1942, § 8343; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 44, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-115.
Supervisors to have general supervision; board may provide for transportation needs of its members.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors in each county is to have and is required to exercise jurisdiction over the public highways of the county.

The board of supervisors may by order duly adopted and entered on its minutes, provide for such transportation of individual members of the board as is necessary and essential in the performance of their official duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4467; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7141; 1930, § 6413; 1942, § 8343; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 44, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-117.
Members of board to inspect roads; preparation of four-year construction and major maintenance plan.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Each member of the board of supervisors shall inspect every road, bridge and ferry in each district at least annually, at times to be fixed by the board, and shall file with the clerk of the board a report, under oath, of the condition of the several roads, bridges and ferries inspected by him, with such recommendations as are needful, which reports shall be presented to the board of supervisors and kept on file for three (3) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3935; 1906, § 4447; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7127; 1930, § 6414; 1942, § 8344; Laws, 1986, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 45, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-117.
Members of board to inspect roads; preparation of four-year construction and major maintenance plan.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

Each member of the board of supervisors shall inspect every road and bridge in the county under the jurisdiction of the county not later than December 31, 1989, and, thereafter, not less than once each fiscal year. Each member shall file with the clerk of the board a report, under oath, of the condition of the roads and bridges inspected by him with recommendations by him for a four-year plan for construction and major maintenance of such roads and bridges. Based upon such reports, the board of supervisors shall, on or before February 1, 1990, and on or before February 1 of each year thereafter, adopt and spread upon its minutes a four-year plan for the construction and maintenance of county roads and bridges. The plan may be amended at any time by a vote of the majority of the members of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3935; 1906, § 4447; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7127; 1930, § 6414; 1942, § 8344; Laws, 1986, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 45, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-7-119.
Liability for neglect of duty.

The circuit judge shall at each term of the court especially charge the grand jury to inquire into the condition of the roads of any county. Any contractor or overseer or supervisor who neglects his duty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be liable to indictment and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 4473; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7148; 1930, § 6415; 1942, § 8345.

§ 65-7-121.
Abandonment by board of supervisors of any section of county road system; hearing; notice; posting of signs; liability after abandonment; notice to railroad; easements.

The board of supervisors of any county may, upon its own motion or upon the petition of any interested resident of the county, by resolution spread upon its minutes, declare any section of the county road system abandoned upon its finding that one or more of the following circumstances are applicable to the section in question:

The section does not provide primary access to occupied properties;

Traffic on the section has for a period of at least ten (10) consecutive years been intermittent and of such low volume that no substantial public purpose is being served thereby;

The board of supervisors has, for a period of at least the previous five (5) consecutive years, not maintained such section as part of the county road system; or

For any reason, the public interest or convenience does not require the section to remain open to the public or that it is in the public interest or convenience to close, vacate and abandon the section.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, before any section of the county road system may be abandoned as provided in this section, the board of supervisors shall hold a public hearing on the question of such abandonment and shall publish notice of such hearing at least two (2) times, not less than two (2) weeks prior to the date of the hearing, in a newspaper having general circulation in the county.

[Repealed].

The resolution of the board of supervisors abandoning any section of the county road system will abrogate the easement theretofore owned, held, claimed or used by or on behalf of the general public but will not affect any private easements.

Upon the abandonment of any section of the county road system, the board of supervisors shall post clearly visible signs at any intersection of the abandoned roadway with the county road system indicating that the abandoned section is no longer part of the county road system and is not maintained by the county. Once the required signs are posted, the county shall not be liable for the death of or injury to a vehicle owner, operator or passenger, or for damage to a vehicle or its contents, resulting from a dangerous condition on the abandoned section. If there exists a public railroad grade crossing or railroad bridge on the section of county road so abandoned, the county shall furnish the railroad or individual owning such railroad trackage with a copy of the resolution authorizing the abandonment and thereupon, the railroad company or individual owning such trackage may barricade the crossing or remove the bridge.

From and after July 1, 2000, any proceedings under this section shall be documented in the official record of the county road system in accordance with the requirements of Section 65-7-4.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 313; Laws, 1992, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 539, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.